Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2029.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 49-1333, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-1333. Water conservation grant fund; procedures; reporting; definition A. In compliance with any applicable requirements, an eligible entity as defined in section 49-1301 may apply to the authority for and accept grants from the water conservation grant fund for a water conservation program or project that complies with the requirements of sections 49-1332 and 49-1334. A nongovernment nongovernmental organization that focuses on water conservation or environmental protection may apply to the authority for and accept grants from the water conservation grant fund for a water conservation program or project if it partners with an eligible entity as defined in section 49-1301. An eligible entity may apply to the authority for and accept grants from the water conservation grant fund to distribute rebates for the installation of gray water systems. B. The authority shall: 1. Prescribe a simplified form and procedure to apply for and approve assistance. 2. Establish by rule criteria that are consistent with this article by which assistance will be awarded. 3. Determine the order and priority of water conservation programs or projects assisted under this section based on the merits of the application with respect to the requirements of sections 49-1332 and 49-1334. 4. Provide that a single water conservation program grant may not exceed $3,000,000, a single water conservation project grant may not exceed $250,000 and at least a twenty-five percent match is required for each water conservation program or project. Monies from any other source may satisfy the match requirement. C. An eligible entity that receives water from a multi-county water conservation district organized pursuant to title 48, chapter 22 and that applies for a grant from the water conservation grant fund shall disclose the following in the eligible entity's application: 1. The projected water savings. 2. The source of any water that the project is estimated to save and whether the estimated water to be saved is groundwater or surface water. 3. The eligible entity's plan for the saved water. D. For the purposes of this section, "eligible entity" has the same meaning prescribed in section 49-1301. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Rulemaking Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this act, the water infrastructure finance authority shall adopt rules to implement this act. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.